Missouri, session 2026, SB865.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.020, 287.043, 287.067, 287.120,
and 287.140, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 287.020, 287.043, 287.067,
287.120, 287.140, and 287.485, to read as follows:
287.020. 1. The word "employee" as used in this
chapter shall be construed to mean every person in the
service of any employer, as defined in this chapter, under
any contract of hire, express or implied, oral or written,
or under any appointment or election, including executive
officers of corporations. Except as otherwise provided in
section 287.200, any reference to any employee who has been
injured shall, when the employee is dead, also include his
or her dependents, and other persons to whom compensation
may be payable. The word "employee" shall also include all
minors who work for an employer, whether or not such minors
are employed in violation of law, and all such minors are
hereby made of full age for all purposes under, in
connection with, or arising out of this chapter. The word
"employee" shall not include an individual who is the owner,
as defined in section 301.010, and operator of a motor
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 865 2
vehicle which is leased or contracted with a driver to a for-
hire motor carrier operating within a commercial zone as
defined in section 390.020 or 390.041, or operating under a
certificate issued by the Missouri department of
transportation or by the United States Department of
Transportation, or any of its subagencies. The word
"employee" also shall not include any person performing
services for board, lodging, aid, or sustenance received
from any religious, charitable, or relief organization.
2. The word "accident" as used in this chapter shall
mean an unexpected [traumatic event or unusual strain
identifiable by time and place of occurrence] or unforeseen
identifiable event or series of events happening suddenly
and violently, with or without human fault, and producing at
the time objective symptoms of an injury [caused by a
specific event during a single work shift]. An injury is
compensable if it is clearly work related. An injury is
clearly work related if work was a substantial factor in the
cause of the resulting medical condition or disability. An
injury is not compensable merely because work was a
triggering or precipitating factor.
3. (1) In this chapter the term "injury" is hereby
defined to be an injury which has arisen out of and in the
course of employment. [An injury by accident is compensable
only if the accident was the prevailing factor in causing
both the resulting medical condition and disability. "The
prevailing factor" is defined to be the primary factor, in
relation to any other factor, causing both the resulting
medical condition and disability.]
(2) An injury shall be deemed to arise out of and in
the course of the employment only if:

SB 865 3
(a) It is reasonably apparent, upon consideration of
all the circumstances, that the [accident] employment is
[the prevailing] a substantial factor in causing the injury;
and
(b) It can be seen to have followed as a natural
incident of the work; and
(c) It can be fairly traced to the employment as a
proximate cause; and
(d) It does not come from a hazard or risk unrelated
to the employment to which workers would have been equally
exposed outside of and unrelated to the employment in normal
nonemployment life.
(3) An injury resulting directly or indirectly from
idiopathic causes is not compensable.
(4) A cardiovascular, pulmonary, respiratory, or other
disease, or cerebrovascular accident or myocardial
infarction suffered by a worker is an injury only if the
[accident] employment is [the prevailing] a substantial
factor in causing the resulting medical condition.
(5) The terms "injury" and "personal injuries" shall
mean violence to the physical structure of the body and to
the personal property which is used to make up the physical
structure of the body, such as artificial dentures,
artificial limbs, glass eyes, eyeglasses, and other
prostheses which are placed in or on the body to replace the
physical structure and such disease or infection as
naturally results therefrom. These terms shall in no case
except as specifically provided in this chapter be construed
to include occupational disease in any form, nor shall they
be construed to include any contagious or infectious disease
contracted during the course of the employment, nor shall

SB 865 4
they include death due to natural causes occurring while the
worker is at work.
4. "Death" when mentioned as a basis for the right to
compensation means only death resulting from such violence
and its resultant effects occurring within three hundred
weeks after the accident; except that in cases of
occupational disease, the limitation of three hundred weeks
shall not be applicable.
5. Injuries sustained in company-owned or subsidized
automobiles in accidents that occur while traveling from the
employee's home to the employer's principal place of
business or from the employer's principal place of business
to the employee's home are not compensable. The extension
of premises doctrine [is abrogated to the extent it extends]
as it existed prior to August 28, 2005 is reinstated for
liability for accidents that occur on property not owned or
controlled by the employer even if the accident occurs on
customary, approved, permitted, usual or accepted routes
used by the employee to get to and from their place of
employment.
6. The term "total disability" as used in this chapter
100 shall mean inability to return to any employment and not
101 merely mean inability to return to the employment in which
102 the employee was engaged at the time of the accident.
103 7. As used in this chapter and all acts amendatory
104 thereof, the term "commission" shall hereafter be construed
105 as meaning and referring exclusively to the labor and
106 industrial relations commission of Missouri, and the term
107 "director" shall hereafter be construed as meaning the
108 director of the department of commerce and insurance of the
109 state of Missouri or such agency of government as shall
110 exercise the powers and duties now conferred and imposed

SB 865 5
111 upon the department of commerce and insurance of the state
112 of Missouri.
113 8. The term "division" as used in this chapter means
114 the division of workers' compensation of the department of
115 labor and industrial relations of the state of Missouri.
116 9. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "minor"
117 means a person who has not attained the age of eighteen
118 years; except that, for the purpose of computing the
119 compensation provided for in this chapter, the provisions of
120 section 287.250 shall control.
121 10. In applying the provisions of this chapter, it is
122 the intent of the legislature to [reject and abrogate
123 earlier] adopt case law interpretations on the meaning of or
124 definition of "accident", "occupational disease", "arising
125 out of", and "in the course of the employment" to include,
126 but not be limited to, holdings in: Bennett v. Columbia
127 Health Care and Rehabilitation, 80 S.W.3d 524 (Mo.App. W.D.
128 2002); Kasl v. Bristol Care, Inc., 984 S.W.2d 852 (Mo.banc
129 1999); and Drewes v. TWA, 984 S.W.2d 512 (Mo.banc 1999) and
130 all cases citing, interpreting, applying, or following those
131 cases. All case law inconsistent with such interpretations
132 is abrogated.
133 11. For the purposes of this chapter, "occupational
134 diseases due to toxic exposure" shall only include the
135 following: mesothelioma, asbestosis, berylliosis, coal
136 worker's pneumoconiosis, brochiolitis obliterans, silicosis,
137 silicotuberculosis, manganism, acute myelogenous leukemia,
138 and myelodysplastic syndrome.
139 12. For the purposes of this chapter, "maximum medical
140 improvement" shall mean the point at which the injured
141 employee's medical condition has stabilized and can no

SB 865 6
142 longer reasonably improve with additional medical care, as
143 determined within a reasonable degree of medical certainty.
287.043. In applying the provisions of subsection 1 of
section 287.020 and subsection 4 of section 287.040, it is
the intent of the legislature to [reject and abrogate
earlier] adopt case law interpretations on the meaning of or
definition of "owner", as extended in the following cases:
Owner Operator Independent Drivers Ass'n., Inc. v. New
Prime, Inc., 133 S.W.3d 162 (Mo. App. S.D., 2004); Nunn v.
C.C. Midwest, 151 S.W.3d 388 (Mo. App. W.D., 2004). All
case law inconsistent with such interpretations is abrogated.
287.067. 1. In this chapter the term "occupational
disease" is hereby defined to mean, unless a different
meaning is clearly indicated by the context, an identifiable
disease arising with or without human fault out of and in
the course of the employment. Ordinary diseases of life to
which the general public is exposed outside of the
employment shall not be compensable, except where the
diseases follow as an incident of an occupational disease as
defined in this section. The disease need not to have been
foreseen or expected but after its contraction it must
appear to have had its origin in a risk connected with the
employment and to have flowed from that source as a rational
consequence.
2. An injury or death by occupational disease is
compensable [only] if [the occupational exposure was the
prevailing factor in causing both the resulting medical
condition and disability. The "prevailing factor" is
defined to be the primary factor, in relation to any other
factor, causing both the resulting medical condition and
disability. Ordinary, gradual deterioration, or progressive
degeneration of the body caused by aging or by the normal

SB 865 7
activities of day-to-day living shall not be compensable] it
is clearly work related and meets the requirements of an
injury which is compensable as provided in subsections 2 and
3 of section 287.020. An occupational disease is not
compensable merely because work was a triggering or
precipitating factor.
3. An injury due to repetitive motion is recognized as
an occupational disease for purposes of this chapter. An
occupational disease due to repetitive motion is compensable
[only] if the occupational exposure was [the prevailing] a
substantial factor in causing both the resulting medical
condition and disability. [The "prevailing factor" is
defined to be the primary factor, in relation to any other
factor, causing both the resulting medical condition and
disability. Ordinary, gradual deterioration, or progressive
degeneration of the body caused by aging or by the normal
activities of day-to-day living shall not be compensable.]
4. "Loss of hearing due to industrial noise" is
recognized as an occupational disease for purposes of this
chapter and is hereby defined to be a loss of hearing in one
or both ears due to prolonged exposure to harmful noise in
employment. "Harmful noise" means sound capable of
producing occupational deafness.
5. "Radiation disability" is recognized as an
occupational disease for purposes of this chapter and is
hereby defined to be that disability due to radioactive
properties or substances or to Roentgen rays (X-rays) or
exposure to ionizing radiation caused by any process
involving the use of or direct contact with radium or
radioactive properties or substances or the use of or direct
exposure to Roentgen rays (X-rays) or ionizing radiation.

SB 865 8
6. Disease of the lungs or respiratory tract,
hypotension, hypertension, or disease of the heart or
cardiovascular system, including carcinoma, may be
recognized as occupational diseases for the purposes of this
chapter and are defined to be disability due to exposure to
smoke, gases, carcinogens, inadequate oxygen, of paid
firefighters of a paid fire department or paid police
officers of a paid police department certified under chapter
590 if a direct causal relationship is established, or
psychological stress of firefighters of a paid fire
department or paid peace officers of a police department who
are certified under chapter 590 if a direct causal
relationship is established.
7. Any employee who is exposed to and contracts any
contagious or communicable disease arising out of and in the
course of his or her employment shall be eligible for
benefits under this chapter as an occupational disease.
8. With regard to occupational disease due to
repetitive motion, if the exposure to the repetitive motion
which is found to be the cause of the injury is for a period
of less than three months and the evidence demonstrates that
the exposure to the repetitive motion with the immediate
prior employer was [the prevailing] a substantial
contributing factor in causing the injury, the prior
employer shall be liable for such occupational disease.
9. (1) (a) Posttraumatic stress disorder (PTSD), as
described in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Health Disorders, Fifth Edition, published by the American
Psychiatric Association, (DSM-5) is recognized as a
compensable occupational disease for purposes of this
chapter when diagnosed in a first responder, as that term is
defined under section 67.145.

SB 865 9
(b) Benefits payable to a first responder under this
section shall not require a physical injury to the first
responder, and are not subject to any preexisting PTSD.
(c) Benefits payable to a first responder under this
section are compensable only if demonstrated by clear and
convincing evidence that PTSD has resulted from the course
and scope of employment, and the first responder is examined
and diagnosed with PTSD by an authorized treating physician,
due to the first responder experiencing one of the following
qualifying events:
a. Seeing for oneself a deceased minor;
b. Witnessing directly the death of a minor;
c. Witnessing directly the injury to a minor who
subsequently died prior to or upon arrival at a hospital
emergency department, participating in the physical
100 treatment of, or manually transporting, an injured minor who
101 subsequently died prior to or upon arrival at a hospital
102 emergency department;
103 d. Seeing for oneself a person who has suffered
104 serious physical injury of a nature that shocks the
105 conscience;
106 e. Witnessing directly a death, including suicide, due
107 to serious physical injury; or homicide, including murder,
108 mass killings, manslaughter, self-defense, misadventure, and
109 negligence;
110 f. Witnessing directly an injury that results in
111 death, if the person suffered serious physical injury that
112 shocks the conscience;
113 g. Participating in the physical treatment of an
114 injury, including attempted suicide, or manually
115 transporting an injured person who suffered serious physical

SB 865 10
116 injury, if the injured person subsequently died prior to or
117 upon arrival at a hospital emergency department; or
118 h. Involvement in an event that caused or may have
119 caused serious injury or harm to the first responder or had
120 the potential to cause the death of the first responder,
121 whether accidental or by an intentional act of another
122 individual.
123 (2) The time for notice of injury or death in cases of
124 compensable PTSD under this section is measured from
125 exposure to one of the qualifying stressors listed in the
126 DSM-5 criteria, or the diagnosis of the disorder, whichever
127 is later. Any claim for compensation for such injury shall
128 be properly noticed within fifty-two weeks after the
129 qualifying exposure, or the diagnosis of the disorder,
130 whichever is later.
287.120. 1. Every employer subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall be liable, irrespective of negligence,
to furnish compensation under the provisions of this chapter
for personal injury or death of the employee by accident or
occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the
employee's employment. Any employee of such employer shall
not be liable for any injury or death for which compensation
is recoverable under this chapter and every employer and
employees of such employer shall be released from all other
liability whatsoever, whether to the employee or any other
person, except that an employee shall not be released from
liability for injury or death if the employee engaged in an
affirmative negligent act that purposefully and dangerously
caused or increased the risk of injury. The term "accident"
as used in this section shall include, but not be limited
to, injury or death of the employee caused by the unprovoked
violence or assault against the employee by any person.

SB 865 11
2. The rights and remedies herein granted to an
employee shall exclude all other rights and remedies of the
employee, the employee's spouse, parents, personal
representatives, dependents, heirs or next kin, at common
law or otherwise, on account of such injury or death by
accident or occupational disease, except such rights and
remedies as are not provided for by this chapter.
3. No compensation shall be allowed under this chapter
for the injury or death due to the employee's intentional
self-inflicted injury, but the burden of proof of
intentional self-inflicted injury shall be on the employer
or the person contesting the claim for allowance.
4. Where the injury is caused by the failure of the
employer to comply with any statute in this state or any
lawful order of the division or the commission, the
compensation and death benefit provided for under this
chapter shall be increased fifteen percent.
5. Where the injury is caused by the failure of the
employee to use safety devices where provided by the
employer, or from the employee's failure to obey any
reasonable rule adopted by the employer for the safety of
employees, the compensation and death benefit provided for
herein shall be reduced at least twenty-five but not more
than fifty percent; provided, that it is shown that the
employee had actual knowledge of the rule so adopted by the
employer; and provided, further, that the employer had,
prior to the injury, made a reasonable effort to cause his
or her employees to use the safety device or devices and to
obey or follow the rule so adopted for the safety of the
employees.
6. (1) Where the employee fails to obey any rule or
policy adopted by the employer relating to a drug-free

SB 865 12
workplace or the use of alcohol or nonprescribed controlled
drugs in the workplace, the compensation and death benefit
provided for herein shall be reduced fifty percent if the
injury was sustained in conjunction with the use of alcohol
or nonprescribed controlled drugs.
(2) If, however, the use of alcohol or nonprescribed
controlled drugs in violation of the employer's rule or
policy is the proximate cause of the injury, then the
benefits or compensation otherwise payable under this
chapter for death or disability shall be forfeited.
(3) The voluntary use of alcohol to the percentage of
blood alcohol sufficient under Missouri law to constitute
legal intoxication shall give rise to a rebuttable
presumption that the voluntary use of alcohol under such
circumstances was the proximate cause of the injury. A
preponderance of the evidence standard shall apply to rebut
such presumption. An employee's refusal to take a test for
alcohol or a nonprescribed controlled substance, as defined
by section 195.010, at the request of the employer shall
result in the forfeiture of benefits under this chapter if
the employer had sufficient cause to suspect use of alcohol
or a nonprescribed controlled substance by the claimant or
if the employer's policy clearly authorizes post-injury
testing.
(4) Any positive test result for a nonprescribed
controlled drug or the metabolites of such drug from an
employee shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption, which
may be rebutted by a preponderance of evidence, that the
tested nonprescribed controlled drug was in the employee's
system at the time of the accident or injury and that the
injury was sustained in conjunction with the use of the
tested nonprescribed controlled drug if:

SB 865 13
(a) The initial testing was administered within twenty-
four hours of the accident or injury;
(b) Notice was given to the employee of the test
results within fourteen calendar days of the insurer or
group self-insurer receiving actual notice of the
confirmatory test results;
(c) The employee was given an opportunity to perform a
second test upon the original sample; and
(d) The initial or any subsequent testing that forms
the basis of the presumption was confirmed by mass
spectrometry using generally accepted medical or forensic
testing procedures.
7. Where the employee's participation in a
recreational activity or program is the [prevailing]
proximate cause of the injury, benefits or compensation
otherwise payable under this chapter for death or disability
shall be forfeited regardless that the employer may have
promoted, sponsored or supported the recreational activity
100 or program, expressly or impliedly, in whole or in part.
101 The forfeiture of benefits or compensation shall not apply
102 when:
103 (1) The employee was directly ordered by the employer
104 to participate in such recreational activity or program;
105 (2) The employee was paid wages or travel expenses
106 while participating in such recreational activity or
107 program; or
108 (3) The injury from such recreational activity or
109 program occurs on the employer's premises due to an unsafe
110 condition and the employer had actual knowledge of the
111 employee's participation in the recreational activity or
112 program and of the unsafe condition of the premises and

SB 865 14
113 failed to either curtail the recreational activity or
114 program or cure the unsafe condition.
115 8. Mental injury resulting from work-related stress
116 does not arise out of and in the course of the employment,
117 unless it is demonstrated that the stress is work related
118 and was extraordinary and unusual. The amount of work
119 stress shall be measured by objective standards and actual
120 events.
121 9. A mental injury is not considered to arise out of
122 and in the course of the employment if it resulted from any
123 disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff,
124 demotion, termination or any similar action taken in good
125 faith by the employer.
126 10. The ability of a firefighter to receive benefits
127 for psychological stress under section 287.067 shall not be
128 diminished by the provisions of subsections 8 and 9 of this
129 section.
287.140. 1. In addition to all other compensation
paid to the employee under this section, the employee shall
receive and the employer shall provide such medical,
surgical, chiropractic, and hospital treatment, including
nursing, custodial, ambulance and medicines, as may
reasonably be required after the injury or disability, to
cure and relieve from the effects of the injury. If the
employee desires, he shall have the right to select his own
physician, surgeon, or other such requirement at his own
expense. Where the requirements are furnished by a public
hospital or other institution, payment therefor shall be
made to the proper authorities. Regardless of whether the
health care provider is selected by the employer or is
selected by the employee at the employee's expense, the
health care provider shall have the affirmative duty to

SB 865 15
communicate fully with the employee regarding the nature of
the employee's injury and recommended treatment exclusive of
any evaluation for a permanent disability rating. Failure
to perform such duty to communicate shall constitute a
disciplinary violation by the provider subject to the
provisions of chapter 620. When an employee is required to
submit to medical examinations or necessary medical
treatment at a place outside of the local or metropolitan
area from the employee's principal place of employment, the
employer or its insurer shall advance or reimburse the
employee for all necessary and reasonable expenses; except
that an injured employee who resides outside the state of
Missouri and who is employed by an employer located in
Missouri shall have the option of selecting the location of
services provided in this section either at a location
within one hundred miles of the injured employee's
residence, place of injury or place of hire by the
employer. The choice of provider within the location
selected shall continue to be made by the employer. In case
of a medical examination if a dispute arises as to what
expenses shall be paid by the employer, the matter shall be
presented to the legal advisor, the administrative law judge
or the commission, who shall set the sum to be paid and same
shall be paid by the employer prior to the medical
examination. In no event, however, shall the employer or
its insurer be required to pay transportation costs for a
greater distance than two hundred fifty miles each way from
place of treatment.
2. If it be shown to the division or the commission
that the requirements are being furnished in such manner
that there is reasonable ground for believing that the life,
health, or recovery of the employee is endangered thereby,

SB 865 16
the division or the commission may order a change in the
physician, surgeon, hospital or other requirement.
3. All fees and charges under this chapter shall be
fair and reasonable, shall be subject to regulation by the
division or the commission, or the board of rehabilitation
in rehabilitation cases. A health care provider shall not
charge a fee for treatment and care which is governed by the
provisions of this chapter greater than the usual and
customary fee the provider receives for the same treatment
or service when the payor for such treatment or service is a
private individual or a private health insurance carrier.
The division or the commission, or the board of
rehabilitation in rehabilitation cases, shall also have
jurisdiction to hear and determine all disputes as to such
charges. A health care provider is bound by the
determination upon the reasonableness of health care bills.
4. The division shall, by regulation, establish
methods to resolve disputes concerning the reasonableness of
medical charges, services, or aids. This regulation shall
govern resolution of disputes between employers and medical
providers over fees charged, whether or not paid, and shall
be in lieu of any other administrative procedure under this
chapter. The employee shall not be a party to a dispute
over medical charges, nor shall the employee's recovery in
any way be jeopardized because of such dispute. Any
application for payment of additional reimbursement, as such
term is used in 8 CSR 50- 2.030, as amended, shall be filed
not later than:
(1) Two years from the date the first notice of
dispute of the medical charge was received by the health
care provider if such services were rendered before July 1,
2013; and

SB 865 17
(2) One year from the date the first notice of dispute
of the medical charge was received by the health care
provider if such services were rendered after July 1, 2013.
Notice shall be presumed to occur no later than five
business days after transmission by certified United States
mail.
5. No compensation shall be payable for the death or
disability of an employee, if and insofar as the death or
disability may be caused, continued or aggravated by any
unreasonable refusal to submit to any medical or surgical
treatment or operation, the risk of which is, in the opinion
of the division or the commission, inconsiderable in view of
the seriousness of the injury. If the employee dies as a
result of an operation made necessary by the injury, the
death shall be deemed to be caused by the injury.
6. The testimony of any physician or chiropractic
physician who treated the employee shall be admissible in
evidence in any proceedings for compensation under this
chapter, subject to all of the provisions of section 287.210.
7. Every hospital or other person furnishing the
100 employee with medical aid shall permit its record to be
101 copied by and shall furnish full information to the division
102 or the commission, the employer, the employee or his
103 dependents and any other party to any proceedings for
104 compensation under this chapter, and certified copies of the
105 records shall be admissible in evidence in any such
106 proceedings.
107 8. The employer may be required by the division or the
108 commission to furnish an injured employee with artificial
109 legs, arms, hands, surgical orthopedic joints, or eyes, or
110 braces, as needed, for life whenever the division or the

SB 865 18
111 commission shall find that the injured employee may be
112 partially or wholly relieved of the effects of a permanent
113 injury by the use thereof. The director of the division
114 shall establish a procedure whereby a claim for compensation
115 may be reactivated after settlement of such claim is
116 completed. The claim shall be reactivated only after the
117 claimant can show good cause for the reactivation of this
118 claim and the claim shall be made only for the payment of
119 medical procedures involving life-threatening surgical
120 procedures or if the claimant requires the use of a new, or
121 the modification, alteration or exchange of an existing,
122 prosthetic device. For the purpose of this subsection,
123 "life threatening" shall mean a situation or condition
124 which, if not treated immediately, will likely result in the
125 death of the injured worker.
126 9. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an employee
127 being provided treatment for his injuries by prayer or
128 spiritual means if the employer does not object to the
129 treatment.
130 10. The employer shall have the right to select the
131 licensed treating physician, surgeon, chiropractic
132 physician, or other health care provider; provided, however,
133 that such physicians, surgeons or other health care
134 providers shall offer only those services authorized within
135 the scope of their licenses. For the purpose of this
136 subsection, subsection 2 of section 287.030 shall not apply.
137 11. Any physician or other health care provider who
138 orders, directs or refers a patient for treatment, testing,
139 therapy or rehabilitation at any institution or facility
140 shall, at or prior to the time of the referral, disclose in
141 writing if such health care provider, any of his partners or
142 his employer has a financial interest in the institution or

SB 865 19
143 facility to which the patient is being referred, to the
144 following:
145 (1) The patient;
146 (2) The employer of the patient with workers'
147 compensation liability for the injury or disease being
148 treated;
149 (3) The workers' compensation insurer of such
150 employer; and
151 (4) The workers' compensation adjusting company for
152 such insurer.
153 12. Violation of subsection 11 of this section is a
154 class A misdemeanor.
155 13. (1) No hospital, physician or other health care
156 provider, other than a hospital, physician or health care
157 provider selected by the employee at his own expense
158 pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, shall bill or
159 attempt to collect any fee or any portion of a fee for
160 services rendered to an employee due to a work-related
161 injury or report to any credit reporting agency any failure
162 of the employee to make such payment, when an injury covered
163 by this chapter has occurred and such hospital, physician or
164 health care provider has received actual notice given in
165 writing by the employee, the employer or the employer's
166 insurer. Actual notice shall be deemed received by the
167 hospital, physician or health care provider five days after
168 mailing by certified mail by the employer or insurer to the
169 hospital, physician or health care provider.
170 (2) The notice shall include:
171 (a) The name of the employer;
172 (b) The name of the insurer, if known;
173 (c) The name of the employee receiving the services;
174 (d) The general nature of the injury, if known; and

SB 865 20
175 (e) Where a claim has been filed, the claim number, if
176 known.
177 (3) When an injury is found to be noncompensable under
178 this chapter, the hospital, physician or other health care
179 provider shall be entitled to pursue the employee for any
180 unpaid portion of the fee or other charges for authorized
181 services provided to the employee. Any applicable statute
182 of limitations for an action for such fees or other charges
183 shall be tolled from the time notice is given to the
184 division by a hospital, physician or other health care
185 provider pursuant to subdivision (6) of this subsection,
186 until a determination of noncompensability in regard to the
187 injury which is the basis of such services is made, or in
188 the event there is an appeal to the labor and industrial
189 relations commission, until a decision is rendered by that
190 commission.
191 (4) If a hospital, physician or other health care
192 provider or a debt collector on behalf of such hospital,
193 physician or other health care provider pursues any action
194 to collect from an employee after such notice is properly
195 given, the employee shall have a cause of action against the
196 hospital, physician or other health care provider for actual
197 damages sustained plus up to one thousand dollars in
198 additional damages, costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
199 (5) If an employer or insurer fails to make payment
200 for authorized services provided to the employee by a
201 hospital, physician or other health care provider pursuant
202 to this chapter, the hospital, physician or other health
203 care provider may proceed pursuant to subsection 4 of this
204 section with a dispute against the employer or insurer for
205 any fees or other charges for services provided.

SB 865 21
206 (6) A hospital, physician or other health care
207 provider whose services have been authorized in advance by
208 the employer or insurer may give notice to the division of
209 any claim for fees or other charges for services provided
210 for a work-related injury that is covered by this chapter,
211 with copies of the notice to the employee, employer and the
212 employer's insurer. Where such notice has been filed, the
213 administrative law judge may order direct payment from the
214 proceeds of any settlement or award to the hospital,
215 physician or other health care provider for such fees as are
216 determined by the division. The notice shall be on a form
217 prescribed by the division.
218 [14. The employer may allow or require an employee to
219 use any of the employee's accumulated paid leave, personal
220 leave, or medical or sick leave to attend to medical
221 treatment, physical rehabilitation, or medical evaluations
222 during work time. The intent of this subsection is to
223 specifically supercede and abrogate any case law that
224 contradicts the express language of this section.]
287.485. Any time after one year following the date
when an employee has reached maximum medical improvement
based on the evaluation of a physician, either the employee
or the employer may request a final hearing. Such final
hearing shall be set within six months after when the
request is made and not to be continued, cancelled, or reset
without consent of both the employee and the employer.
✓